Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 3. Unlawful Assembly.

Sec. 12.60.180.
Unlawful or riotous assembly.

Where six or more persons, whether armed or not, are riotously assembled, a district judge, magistrate, peace officer, or the chief executive officer of a city, town, village, or settlement shall go among the persons assembled, or as near to them as can be done with safety, and command them in the name of the state to disperse.

History.

(§ 9.16 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 19 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Collateral references. —

53A Am. Jur. 2d, Mobs and Riots, § 1 et seq.

77 C.J.S., Riot

Insurrection, § 1 et seq.

What constitutes offense of unlawful assembly. 71 ALR2d 875.

Sec. 12.60.190.
Arrest on failure to disperse and commanding aid.

If the persons assembled do not immediately disperse, the district judges, magistrates, and officers shall arrest them. Any two of the officers mentioned in AS

12.60.180

may command the aid of a sufficient number of persons, armed or otherwise, as may be necessary, and may proceed in the manner as in their judgment may be most expedient to disperse the assembly and arrest the offenders.

History.

(§ 9.19 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 27 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.200.
Person refusing to aid officers as rioter. [Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 12.60.210.
Officer failing to act is guilty of misdemeanor.

If a district judge, magistrate, or officer having notice of an unlawful or riotous assembly, mentioned in AS

12.60.180

, neglects to proceed to the place of assembly, or as near as can be done with safety, and to exercise the authority with which invested for suppressing the same and arresting the offenders, that person is guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 9.21 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 29 ch 8 SLA 1971)

Sec. 12.60.220.
Guilt where death ensues.

If, in the effort to suppress or disperse any unlawful or riotous assembly, or to arrest or detain any of the persons engaged in the assembly, any of the rioters or other persons then present as spectators or otherwise are killed or wounded, the district judge, magistrate, and officers and persons acting in their aid are guiltless of the killing or wounding. However, if a district judge, magistrate, or officer or person acting in their aid is killed or wounded, all the persons unlawfully engaged in the assembly are guilty of the killing or wounding.

History.

(§ 9.22 ch 34 SLA 1962; am § 30 ch 8 SLA 1971)